Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. Election Officials

§ 2451.
Board of civil authority.

The board of civil authority shall have charge of the conduct of elections within the political subdivision for which it is elected.

At any time before an election, the board of civil authority may issue guidance for elections officials that assists officials in conducting elections within the political subdivision. Guidance issued by the board shall not conflict with federal or State elections laws.

A quorum of the board of civil authority shall be available at all times when the polls are open, and those members of the board of civil authority present at a polling place shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business relating to the conduct of the election and the qualification and registration of voters at this polling place.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2003, No. 59

, § 16.

§ 2452.
Presiding officer.

The town clerk shall be the presiding officer unless the town by vote at an annual meeting or by charter shall provide otherwise. If the regular presiding officer is unavailable or unable to preside at any given election, then the board of civil authority shall promptly appoint a voter of the town to serve as the presiding officer at that election.

If more than one polling place is used, the board shall appoint a presiding officer for each additional polling place. These presiding officers for additional polling places shall be appointed for no more than two year terms, but may be reappointed and may have their appointments revoked.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 39.

§ 2453.
Duties of presiding officer.

The presiding officer shall be responsible for preparation of polling places and voting equipment, opening and closing the polls, scheduling the working hours of all election officials, counting votes and certifying the results of the count, securing all ballots, maintaining order at the polls, and in all things assuring that the election is conducted according to law.
If it is necessary for the presiding officer to be absent from the polling place during any part of the election, he or she shall designate another to act in his or her stead until he or she returns.
The presiding officer shall make every reasonable effort to assure that at least one election official from each major party is present at the polling place at all times.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 40.

§ 2454.
Assistant election officers.

Prior to the day of the election, the board of civil authority shall appoint a sufficient number of voters from each municipality to serve as assistant election officers. As far as possible, the board shall attempt to appoint an equal number of persons from each major political party. Each assistant election officer shall be sworn prior to entering on the performance of his or her duties. An assistant town clerk may serve as an assistant elections officer, regardless of his or her residence.

The board of civil authority may appoint residents of a municipality who are 16 or 17 years old to serve as assistant elections officers in their respective polling places. Youth assistant elections officers shall have the same duties as adult assistant elections officers but shall work under the direct supervision of adult elections officials.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 4

, § 1;

2003, No. 59

, § 17;

2009, No. 40

, § 1.

§ 2455.
Election officials; duties; political party representation.

The assistant election officers, together with the presiding officer and the board of civil authority, shall constitute the election officials.

Except as may be specifically provided in this title, the presiding officer shall notify each election official of the hours when he or she shall be present to work at the polls and of the duties assigned to each election official.

When the provisions of this title require two or more election officials of different political parties to perform an act, that political party representation requirement shall not be required if attempts to conform to it were not successful.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 20.

§ 2456.
Disqualifications.

Notwithstanding the preceding sections of this subchapter, no person shall serve as an election official in any election in which his or her name appears on a ballot of the Australian ballot system as a candidate for any office unless he or she is the only candidate for that office, or unless the office for which he or she is a candidate is that of moderator, justice of the peace, town clerk, treasurer, ward clerk, or inspector of elections. When an Australian ballot is not used, a person shall not serve as an election official during the election to fill any office for which he or she is a nominee.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2001, No. 5

, § 4;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2457.
Workshops and information for election officials.

The Secretary of State or his or her designee shall organize regional workshops for election officials, provide them with informational materials about the conduct of elections and recounts, and otherwise help them run elections in conformance with State and federal law.

The regular presiding officer of each town or an assistant designated by the board of civil authority shall attend, at the town’s expense, at least one of these election workshops every two years.
(b) (1) The regular presiding officer of each town or an assistant designated by the board of civil authority shall attend, at the town’s expense, at least one of these election workshops every two years.

Each town clerk shall file with the Secretary of State by December 31 of each even-numbered year a letter certifying compliance with this subsection.

The town clerk of each town shall provide the Secretary of State with the names and addresses of all members of the board of civil authority and shall promptly notify the Secretary of State of any changes in the list.
(c) (1) The town clerk of each town shall provide the Secretary of State with the names and addresses of all members of the board of civil authority and shall promptly notify the Secretary of State of any changes in the list.

The Secretary of State shall invite all members of the boards of civil authority to the workshops and provide them with informational materials.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41; amended

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 59

, § 15;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2458.
Complaint procedure.

The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to establish a uniform and nondiscriminatory complaint procedure to be used by any person who believes that a violation of this title or any other provision of 52 U.S.C. chapter 209, subchapter III (Uniform and Nondiscriminatory Election Technology and Administration Requirements) has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur in the course of any election in which a candidate for federal office appears on the ballot.

As used in this section, “complaint” means a statement in writing made by a voter stating, with particularity, the violation, notarized, and sworn or affirmed under penalty of perjury.

The Secretary’s rules shall provide for an informal proceeding to hear complaints for all complainants unless a formal hearing is requested. Formal complaints held pursuant to this section shall be in conformance with the rules adopted by the Secretary.

Any decision of the Secretary may be appealed to the Superior Court in the county where the individual resides.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 59

, § 18; amended

2019, No. 67

, § 11.